Connecticut, session 2026, HB05330.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 26-107f of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(b) The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection shall
establish a conservation program for species not traditionally harvested,
which shall include, but not be limited to, provisions for the following:
[Resource] Facilitation of the implementation of the most recent
federally approved state of Connecticut wildlife action plan, resource
inventory, including conservation action tracker measures, habitat
conservation, monitoring of environmental and climate change impacts,
conservation of endangered and threatened species, wildlife recreation
management, wildlife conservation education, private landowner
assistance, urban wildlife conservation, problem animal management
and scientific research, planning, administration and development.
Such conservation program shall provide for a wildlife veterinarian to
assist in the oversight and implementation of such conservation
program.
Sec. 2. Section 26-107h of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5330
[On or before February first, annually, the Commissioner of Energy
and Environmental Protection shall submit to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to the environment a report on the progress of the program
established under section 26-107f, the purposes for which any funds
allocated to said program were expended and the future of the
program.]
(a) There is established a working group within the legislature to
identify how the conservation program established in section 26-107f, as
amended by this act, should be funded and implemented.
(b) Not later than thirty days after the effective date of this section,
the cochairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the environment, in
consultation with the ranking members of said committee, and the chief
of the Bureau of Natural Resources of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall jointly select two cochairpersons for
such working group. Not later than forty-five days after the effective
date of this section, the cochairpersons of such working group shall
select the membership of such working group, which shall include, but
not be limited to: (1) One representative of the Department of Energy
and Environmental Protection, the Department of Transportation and
the Office of Policy and Management, (2) two representatives of
conservation advocacy organizations that work on wildlife-related
issues, one of whom shall have fisheries aquatic expertise, (3) one
representative of a land conservation organization, (4) two members of
the faculty of a state college or university, as recommended by the chief
of the Bureau of Natural Resources of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection, (5) one representative from a council of
governments, (6) a representative of the water utilities, (7) a
representative of an organization that represents the marine trades in
the state, (8) a representative of the Connecticut Farm Bureau, or its
designee, and (9) a certified forester in this state.
(c) The cochairpersons of such working group shall convene such
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 5330
working group not later than sixty days after the effective date of this
section. The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the
environment shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
Not later than January 15, 2027, the working group shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations, including any proposed
legislative proposals, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the environment, in
accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a. The working group
shall terminate on the date that it submits such report or January 15,
2027, whichever is later.
Sec. 3. Section 26-107i of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
The Commissioner of Energy and Environmental Protection may
establish a program for the sale of wildlife stamps, prints, posters,
calendars, publications or other items. Any revenue received from the
sale of such goods or materials and any funds donated to the state for
the purpose of the program established under section 26-107f, as
amended by this act, shall be deposited in the General Fund and
allocated to the program established under section 26-107f, as amended
by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 26-107f(b)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 26-107h
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 26-107i
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3